Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-944
State medicaid fraud control unit; powers and duties.

The state medicaid fraud control unit shall employ such attorneys, auditors, investigators, and other personnel as authorized by law to carry out the duties of the unit in an effective and efficient manner. The purpose of the state medicaid fraud control unit is to conduct a statewide program for the investigation and prosecution of medicaid fraud and violations of all applicable state laws relating to the providing of medical assistance and the activities of providers. The state medicaid fraud control unit may review and act on complaints of abuse and neglect of any patients or residents at health care facilities that receive payments under the medical assistance program and of patients who receive medical assistance under the medical assistance program in a noninstitutional or any other setting and may provide for collection or referral for collection of overpayments made under the medical assistance program that are discovered by the unit.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1083;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 44;

Laws 2024, LB664, § 1.